test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_C_konaas_gt-norm.yaml
     konaas+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: konaasenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     konaas+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: konaasensishinaaniban
     konaas+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: konaasensishinaan***idig, idog***
     konaas+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: konaasensishiniiban
     konaas+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: konaasensishini***idig, idog***
     konaas+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: konaasensishiwaaiban
     konaas+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: konaasensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     konaas+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: konaasenhishinaaning
     konaas+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: konaasenhishinaanan
     konaas+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: konaasenhishinaanag
     konaas+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: konaasenhishiniing
     konaas+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: konaasenhishinian
     konaas+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: konaasenhishiniag
     konaas+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: konaasenhishiwaaing
     konaas+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: konaasenhishiwaaan
     konaas+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: konaasenhishiwaaag
     konaas+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: konaasensishinaaning
     konaas+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: konaasensishinaanan
     konaas+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: konaasensishinaanag
     konaas+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: konaasensishiniing
     konaas+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: konaasensishinian
     konaas+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: konaasensishiniag
     konaas+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: konaasensishiwaaing
     konaas+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: konaasensishiwaaan
     konaas+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: konaasensishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     konaas+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: konaasenhishibaning
     konaas+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: konaasenhishibanan
     konaas+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: konaasenhishibanag
     konaas+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: konaasenhish***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: konaasenhish***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: konaasenhish***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: konaasensishibaning
     konaas+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: konaasensishibanan
     konaas+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: konaasensishibanag
     konaas+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: konaasensish***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: konaasensish***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: konaasensish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     konaas+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: konaasenhinaanibaning
     konaas+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: konaasenhinaanibanan
     konaas+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: konaasenhinaanibanag
     konaas+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: konaasenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: konaasenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: konaasenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: konaasenhiniibaning
     konaas+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: konaasenhiniibanan
     konaas+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: konaasenhiniibanag
     konaas+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: konaasenhini***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: konaasenhini***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: konaasenhini***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: konaasenhiwaaibaning
     konaas+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: konaasenhiwaaibanan
     konaas+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: konaasenhiwaaibanag
     konaas+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: konaasenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: konaasenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: konaasenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: konaasensinaanibaning
     konaas+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: konaasensinaanibanan
     konaas+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: konaasensinaanibanag
     konaas+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: konaasensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: konaasensinaan***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: konaasensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: konaasensiniibaning
     konaas+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: konaasensiniibanan
     konaas+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: konaasensiniibanag
     konaas+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: konaasensini***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: konaasensini***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: konaasensini***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: konaasensiwaaibaning
     konaas+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: konaasensiwaaibanan
     konaas+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: konaasensiwaaibanag
     konaas+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: konaasensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: konaasensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: konaasensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     konaas+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: konaasimishinaaniban
     konaas+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: konaasimishinaan***idig, idog***
     konaas+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: konaasimishiniiban
     konaas+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: konaasimishini***idig, idog***
     konaas+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: konaasimishiwaaiban
     konaas+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: konaasimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     konaas+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: konaasimishinaaning
     konaas+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: konaasimishinaanan
     konaas+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: konaasimishinaanag
     konaas+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: konaasimishiniing
     konaas+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: konaasimishinian
     konaas+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: konaasimishiniag
     konaas+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: konaasimishiwaaing
     konaas+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: konaasimishiwaaan
     konaas+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: konaasimishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     konaas+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: konaasimishibaning
     konaas+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: konaasimishibanan
     konaas+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: konaasimishibanag
     konaas+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: konaasimish***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: konaasimish***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: konaasimish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: konaasiminaanibaning
     konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: konaasiminaanibanan
     konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: konaasiminaanibanag
     konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: konaasiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: konaasiminaan***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: konaasiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: konaasiminiibaning
     konaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: konaasiminiibanan
     konaas+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: konaasiminiibanag
     konaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: konaasimini***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: konaasimini***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: konaasimini***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: konaasimiwaaibaning
     konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: konaasimiwaaibanan
     konaas+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: konaasimiwaaibanag
     konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: konaasimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: konaasimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: konaasimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: konaasishinaanibaning
     konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: konaasishinaanibanan
     konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: konaasishinaanibanag
     konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: konaasishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: konaasishinaan***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: konaasishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: konaasishiniibaning
     konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: konaasishiniibanan
     konaas+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: konaasishiniibanag
     konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: konaasishini***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: konaasishini***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: konaasishini***idig, idog***ag
     konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: konaasishiwaaibaning
     konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: konaasishiwaaibanan
     konaas+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: konaasishiwaaibanag
     konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: konaasishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: konaasishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     konaas+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: konaasishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nikonaasenhimishinaan
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nikonaasenhimishini
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nikonaasenhimishiwaa
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nikonaasensimishinaan
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nikonaasensimishini
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nikonaasensimishiwaa
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gikonaasenhimishinaan
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gikonaasenhimishini
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gikonaasenhimishiwaa
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gikonaasensimishinaan
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gikonaasensimishini
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gikonaasensimishiwaa
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: okonaasenhimishinaan
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: okonaasenhimishini
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: okonaasenhimishiwaa
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: okonaasensimishinaan
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: okonaasensimishini
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: okonaasensimishiwaa
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ikonaasenhimishinaan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ikonaasenhimishini
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ikonaasenhimishiwaa
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ikonaasensimishinaan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ikonaasensimishini
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ikonaasensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nikonaasenhimishiban
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nikonaasenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nikonaasensimishiban
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nikonaasensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: gikonaasenhimishiban
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: gikonaasenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: gikonaasensimishiban
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: gikonaasensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: okonaasenhimishiban
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: okonaasenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: okonaasensimishiban
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: okonaasensimish***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: ikonaasenhimishiban
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ikonaasenhimish***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: ikonaasensimishiban
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ikonaasensimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nikonaasenhimishing
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: nikonaasenhimishan
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nikonaasenhimishag
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nikonaasensimishing
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: nikonaasensimishan
     +Px1konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nikonaasensimishag
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: gikonaasenhimishing
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: gikonaasenhimishan
     +Px2konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: gikonaasenhimishag
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: gikonaasensimishing
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: gikonaasensimishan
     +Px2konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: gikonaasensimishag
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: okonaasenhimishing
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: okonaasenhimishan
     +Px3konaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: okonaasenhimishag
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: okonaasensimishing
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: okonaasensimishan
     +Px3konaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: okonaasensimishag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: ikonaasenhimishing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: ikonaasenhimishan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: ikonaasenhimishag
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: ikonaasensimishing
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: ikonaasensimishan
     +PxIndefkonaas+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: ikonaasensimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: nikonaasenhiminaaniban
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nikonaasenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: nikonaasenhiminiiban
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: nikonaasenhimini***idig, idog***
     +Px1konaas+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: nikonaasenhimiwaaiban
